Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1447XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1447XD (3) 91
ll/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 99F.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 01. “Account sharing” means entering into
or participating in an agreement between two or more persons
to, either temporarily or permanently, share access to a
person’s account with the purpose of concealing a person’s
identity, which account has been established with a licensee
to participate in gambling games or sports wagering under this
chapter.
NEW SUBSECTION. 25A. “Proxy betting” means any wagering or
betting activity, including a request of another to engage in
wagering or betting activity, involving two or more persons,
where one person places a wager on behalf of another person
with the intent to hide or conceal the bettor’s identity.
Sec. 2. Section 99F.15, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 3A. A person engaging in proxy betting or
account sharing is in violation of section 725.7.
Sec. 3. Section 725.7, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. Except as permitted in chapters 99B, and 99D, 99E, and
99F, a person shall not do any of the following:
a. Participate in a game for any sum of money or other
property of any value.
b. Make any bet.
c. For a fee, directly or indirectly, give or accept
anything of value to be wagered or to be transmitted or
delivered for a wager to be placed within or without outside of
the state of Iowa.
d. For a fee, deliver anything of value which has been
received outside the enclosure of a racetrack licensed under
chapter 99D, or outside of a gambling structure, to be placed
as wagers a wager in the pari-mutuel pool or other authorized
systems system of wagering.
e. Engage in bookmaking, except as permitted in chapters 99E
LSB 1447XD (3) 91
-1- ll/ns 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
and 99F.
f. Engage in proxy betting as defined in section 99F.1.
g. Engage in account sharing as defined in section 99F.1.